indomorph/hin/adjs.lexc
!!!adjs.lexc for Hindi!!!
Multichar_Symbols
!Morphological properties
+Adj
+Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl +Dir +Obl

LEXICON Root
AdjStem ;

LEXICON ClassI
+Sg+Masc+Dir:^आ # ; ! -aː
+Sg+Masc+Obl:^ए # ; ! -e
+Pl+Masc+Dir:^ए # ; ! -e
+Pl+Masc+Obl:^ए # ; ! -e
+Sg+Fem+Dir:^ई # ; ! -iː
+Sg+Fem+Obl:^ई # ; ! -iː
+Pl+Fem+Dir:^ई # ; ! -iː
+Pl+Fem+Obl:^ई # ; ! -iː

LEXICON ClassII
# ; ! Doesn't inflect

LEXICON AdjStem
अकथ्य ClassII ; ! /aktʰjə/ indescribable, unspeakable
अचल ClassII ; ! /at͡ʃəl/ immoveable, unmovable
अतिवादी ClassII ; ! /ativaːdiː/ ultra, radical
अदन ClassI ; ! /adn-aː/ puny
अधिवासी ClassII ; ! /ad̤ivaːsiː/ domiciled
अनकह ClassI ; ! /ankəɦ-aː/ unstated, tacit
अनसुन ClassI ; ! /ansun-aː/ unheeded, deaf
अनि ClassII ; ! /ani/ unfertilized, unredeemable
अनुमत ClassII ; ! /anumət/ granted, licit
अपमानित ClassII ; ! /apmaːnit/ humiliated, affronted
अप्रसिद्ध ClassII ; ! /aprəsidd̤ə/ obscure
अभाग ClassI ; ! /ab̤aːɡ-aː/ luckless, unfortunate
अमानुषिक ClassII ; ! /amaːnuʂik/ dehumanised, dehumanized
अलंघ्य ClassII ; ! /aləŋɡ̤jə/ unclimbable, insurmountable
अविनाशी ClassII ; ! /avinaːʃiː/ imperishable
असभ्य ClassII ; ! /asb̤jə/ unrefined, barbarous
असंवैधानिक ClassII ; ! /asənvæːd̤aːnik/ unconstitutional
अंतर्राष्ट्रीय ClassII ; ! /ntərraːʂʈriːj/ international
 ClassI ; ! /-aː/ clear-sighted
आत्मकेन्द्रित ClassII ; ! /aːtməkendrit/ self-centered
आध ClassI ; ! /aːd̤-aː/ half, halfway
आपत्तिजनक ClassII ; ! /aːpttid͡ʒnək/ exceptionable, objectionable
आश्चर्यचकित ClassII ; ! /aːʃt͡ʃərjət͡ʃkit/ stupefied, gobsmacked
इतन ClassI ; ! /itn-aː/ all-fired, such
उच्चतम ClassII ; ! /ut͡ʃt͡ʃətəm/ high, top
उदीयमान ClassII ; ! /udiːjmaːn/ nascent, rising
उबल ClassI ; ! /ubl-aː/ poached
उर्वर ClassII ; ! /urvər/ fecund, fertile
ऊपरवाल ClassI ; ! /uːprəvaːl-aː/ upper, uppermost
एटमी ClassII ; ! /eʈmiː/ atomic
ऐस ClassI ; ! /æːs-aː/ similar
कड़व ClassI ; ! /kəɽv-aː/ acerbic, sour
कथित ClassII ; ! /kətʰit/ alleged, supposed
करार ClassI ; ! /kəraːr-aː/ crisp
कष्टमय ClassII ; ! /kəʂʈəməj/ troubled
काल ClassI ; ! /kaːl-aː/ Black, ebony
कितने ClassII ; ! /kitne/ many, how many
कुनकुन ClassI ; ! /kunkun-aː/ lukewarm, tepid
कृश ClassII ; ! /kr̩ʃ/ wasted, diminished
कौनस ClassI ; ! /kɔːns-aː/ what
क्रोधित ClassII ; ! /krod̤it/ up the wall, desperate
खड़ ClassI ; ! /kʰəɽ-aː/ bold, stand-up
खाल ClassI ; ! /kʰaːl-aː/ unfilled
खालिस ClassII ; ! /kʰaːlis/ pure
खुशनुम ClassI ; ! /kʰuʃnum-aː/ convivial
गणमान्य ClassII ; ! /ɡəɳmaːnjə/ titled
गदल ClassI ; ! /ɡədl-aː/ thick, sludgy
गाढ़ ClassI ; ! /ɡaːɽ̥-aː/ close, coarse
गुणित ClassII ; ! /ɡuɳit/ multiplied
गुनगुन ClassI ; ! /ɡunɡun-aː/ lukewarm, tepid
गंदल ClassI ; ! /ɡəndl-aː/ murky
ग्यारह ClassII ; ! /ɡjaːrəɦ/ xi, eleven
घनेर ClassI ; ! /ɡ̤əner-aː/ abundant
घुँघराल ClassI ; ! /ɡ̤əũɡ̤əraːl-aː/ curly, crinkly
चन्द्र ClassII ; ! /t͡ʃəndrə/ lunar
चमड़ ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃəmɽ-aː/ leather
चिड़चिड़ ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃiɽt͡ʃiɽ-aː/ spiky, cross
चिरकालीन ClassII ; ! /t͡ʃirkaːliːn/ age-long
चुनिन्द ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃunind-aː/ opted-out, hand-picked
चौकोन ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃɔːkon-aː/ four-cornered, tetragonal
चंग ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃəŋɡ-aː/ sound, whole
छापामार ClassII ; ! /t͡ʃʰaːpaːmaːr/ raiding
छुतह ClassI ; ! /t͡ʃʰutɦ-aː/ contagious
जम ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒəm-aː/ congealed, accumulated
ज़मींदार ClassII ; ! /zəmiːndaːr/ landowning
जानामान ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒaːnaːmaːn-aː/ well-known
ज़ाहिर ClassII ; ! /zaːɦir/ obvious, unambiguous
जुत ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒut-aː/ ploughed
ज्ञानातीत ClassII ; ! /d͡ʒɲaːnaːtiːt/ transcendent
ज्याद ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒjaːd-aː/ awful, long
झुलस ClassI ; ! /d͡ʒ̤uls-aː/ seared
ठिगन ClassI ; ! /ʈʰiɡn-aː/ short
डूब ClassI ; ! /ɖuːb-aː/ wrapped, captive
डोरेदार ClassII ; ! /ɖoredaːr/ stringy
तपत ClassI ; ! /təpt-aː/ sweltering
ताज़ातरीन ClassII ; ! /taːzaːtriːn/ up-to-the-minute, hot
तिगुन ClassI ; ! /tiɡun-aː/ triple, threefold
तृष्ण ClassI ; ! /tr̩ʂɳ-aː/ athirst
तेजस्वी ClassII ; ! /ted͡ʒsviː/ severe, high-spirited
थोड़ ClassI ; ! /tʰoɽ-aː/ small, scant
दत्त ClassII ; ! /dəttə/ paid
दिखावटी ClassII ; ! /dikʰaːvʈiː/ affected, flash
दिवालिय ClassI ; ! /divaːlij-aː/ bankrupt, insolvent
दुर्भेद्य ClassII ; ! /durb̤edjə/ proof
दुसर ClassI ; ! /dusr-aː/ second
देयत ClassI ; ! /dejt-aː/ transmissible
दोषपूर्ण ClassII ; ! /doʂpuːrɳə/ ill
धमकाय ClassI ; ! /d̤əmkaːj-aː/ intimidated
धर्मसंगत ClassII ; ! /d̤ərməsəŋɡət/ licit
नजरअंदाज ClassII ; ! /nəd͡ʒrəndaːd͡ʒ/ ignored
नशील ClassI ; ! /nəʃiːl-aː/ hard, heady
नाजुक ClassII ; ! /naːd͡ʒuk/ awkward, nice
निन्द ClassI ; ! /nind-aː/ reprehensible
नियत ClassII ; ! /nijət/ set, intended
निर्धारित ClassII ; ! /nird̤aːrit/ set, net
निष्प्रभाव ClassII ; ! /niʂprəb̤aːv/ ineffectual, vain
नौव ClassI ; ! /nɔːv-aː/ ninth, nine
न्यायतंत्र ClassII ; ! /njaːjtəntrə/ judiciary, judicial
पछु ClassI ; ! /pət͡ʃʰu-aː/ west
परदेशी ClassII ; ! /pərdeʃiː/ foreign
पलायनवादी ClassII ; ! /pəlaːjnəvaːdiː/ escapist
पसंदीद ClassI ; ! /pəsəndiːd-aː/ favored, fair-haired
पाँचव ClassI ; ! /pãːt͡ʃəv-aː/ fifth
पिछड़ी ClassII ; ! /pit͡ʃʰɽiː/ trailing
पील ClassI ; ! /piːl-aː/ yellow, sallow
पुरुव ClassI ; ! /puruv-aː/ east
पूर्वलिखित ClassII ; ! /puːrvəlikʰit/ ditto
पोंग ClassI ; ! /poŋɡ-aː/ emasculate, cissy
प्रकार ClassII ; ! /prəkaːr/ several
प्रतिरोधात्मक ClassII ; ! /prətirod̤aːtmək/ obstructive
प्रवण ClassII ; ! /prəvəɳ/ disposed
प्रायोजित ClassII ; ! /praːjod͡ʒit/ motivated
फास्फोरस ClassII ; ! /pʰaːspʰorəs/ phosphorous
फुर्तील ClassI ; ! /pʰurtiːl-aː/ active, sharp
बकाय ClassI ; ! /bəkaːj-aː/ due, delinquent
बड़बड़िय ClassI ; ! /bəɽbəɽij-aː/ blithering
बढिय ClassI ; ! /bəɖ̤ij-aː/ delicate, capital
बदले ClassII ; ! /bədle/ changed
बनानेवाल ClassI ; ! /bənaːnevaːl-aː/ generating
बहक ClassI ; ! /bəɦk-aː/ straying
बहुविध ClassII ; ! /bəɦuvid̤/ multiplex, omnifarious
बावल ClassI ; ! /baːvl-aː/ daft, Daffy
बीत ClassI ; ! /biːt-aː/ past
बीहड़ ClassII ; ! /biːɦəɽ/ arduous, thick
बेइंतह ClassI ; ! /beintɦ-aː/ limitless, endless
बेताब ClassII ; ! /betaːb/ impatient, fevered
बेमज़ ClassI ; ! /bemz-aː/ unfunny
बेहिसाब ClassII ; ! /beɦisaːb/ zillion, obscene
बेहूद ClassI ; ! /beɦuːd-aː/ absurd, doggerel
बँध ClassI ; ! /bə̃d̤-aː/ strung
भर ClassI ; ! /b̤ər-aː/ full, fraught
भस्मी ClassII ; ! /b̤əsmiː/ cinereous
भुतह ClassI ; ! /b̤utɦ-aː/ spooky, spectral
भूविज्ञानी ClassII ; ! /b̤uːvid͡ʒɲaːniː/ geological
भोथर ClassI ; ! /b̤otʰr-aː/ dulled, dull
मज़ाकिय ClassI ; ! /məzaːkij-aː/ tongue-in-cheek, jocular
मदमात ClassI ; ! /mədmaːt-aː/ mellow, tipsy
मध्यमवर्गीय ClassII ; ! /məd̤jəmvərɡiːj/ bourgeois
मस्तमौल ClassI ; ! /məstəmɔːl-aː/ dilettante, nonchalant
महाकाय ClassII ; ! /məɦaːkaːj/ acromegalic, pituitary
मालिकान ClassI ; ! /maːlikaːn-aː/ proprietorial, proprietary
माहवारी ClassII ; ! /maːɦvaːriː/ menstrual, monthly
मुख्यतय ClassI ; ! /mukʰjətj-aː/ primal
मुस्लिम ClassII ; ! /muslim/ Moslem, Muslim
मृत्तिक ClassI ; ! /mr̩ttik-aː/ ceramic
मौकापरस्त ClassII ; ! /mɔːkaːprəstə/ opportunistic
मंझल ClassI ; ! /məɲd͡ʒ̤l-aː/ median, middling
युग्म ClassII ; ! /juɡmə/ double
रक्ष ClassI ; ! /rəkʂ-aː/ protective
राजतंत्रवादी ClassII ; ! /raːd͡ʒtəntrəvaːdiː/ royalist, monarchist
रीत ClassI ; ! /riːt-aː/ empty
रोएँदार ClassII ; ! /roẽdaːr/ fur, shagged
रोज़ान ClassI ; ! /rozaːn-aː/ daily
लचील ClassI ; ! /lət͡ʃiːl-aː/ lissome, lithe
लहरात ClassI ; ! /ləɦraːt-aː/ wavy
लहरी ClassII ; ! /ləɦriː/ blithe, fanciful
लोन ClassI ; ! /lon-aː/ powdered, SALT
लोभी ClassII ; ! /lob̤iː/ covetous, mercenary
वही ClassII ; ! /vəɦiː/ very, the
विचरण ClassII ; ! /vit͡ʃrəɳ/ prolusory
विजेत ClassI ; ! /vid͡ʒet-aː/ champion
विपथगामी ClassII ; ! /viptʰəɡaːmiː/ deviant, aberrant
विशद ClassII ; ! /viʃəd/ prolix, vivid
वैकल्पिक ClassII ; ! /væːklpik/ elective, alternative
शक्तियुक्त ClassII ; ! /ʃəktijuktə/ powered
शर्मिंद ClassI ; ! /ʃərmind-aː/ apologetic, ashamed
शिरोमणि ClassII ; ! /ʃiromɳi/ omnipotent
श्यामवर्णी ClassII ; ! /ʃjaːmvərɳiː/ dark skinned
सजाय ClassI ; ! /səd͡ʒaːj-aː/ decorated
समतुल्य ClassII ; ! /səmtuljə/ equivalent
समूच ClassI ; ! /səmuːt͡ʃ-aː/ complete, integral
सर्वोतम ClassII ; ! /sərvotəm/ star
साध ClassI ; ! /saːd̤-aː/ plain, simple
सिनेमाई ClassII ; ! /sinemaːiː/ cinematic
सिरफिर ClassI ; ! /sirpʰir-aː/ mad as a March hare, mad as a hatter
सुधर ClassI ; ! /sud̤r-aː/ improved
सुहात ClassI ; ! /suɦaːt-aː/ tolerant, bearable
सूखी ClassII ; ! /suːkʰiː/ dry
संकर ClassI ; ! /səŋkr-aː/ narrow, strait
संबोधित ClassII ; ! /səmbod̤it/ addressed
स्वच्छन्द ClassII ; ! /svət͡ʃt͡ʃʰəndə/ free
हक्काबक्क ClassI ; ! /ɦəkkaːbkk-aː/ disamayed, aghast
हिमालयी ClassII ; ! /ɦimaːljiː/ Himalayan
